ko: 스텀프 메커니즘: 분리형 베이스; 고정형; 플렉시 리턴; 영구 부착형 베일; 리바운드; 스프링백; 기타
sl-SI: Mehanizem kriket količka: Snemljiv podstavek; Fiksno; Prilagodljivo vračanje; Fiksne prečke; Odbojno; Vzmetno; Drugo
el: Μηχανισμός στελέχους: Αποσπώμενη βάση; Σταθερό; Εύκαμπτη επαναφορά; Μόνιμα bails; Επαναφορά; Επαναφορά με ελατήριο; Άλλο
fi: Keppien mekanismi: Irrotettava jalusta; Kiinteä; Joustava palautus; Kiinteät poikkipuut; Kimpoava; Jousipalautteinen; Muu
pt-PT: Mecanismo dos postes: Base amovível; Fixo; Retorno flexível; Bails permanentes; Ressalto; Retorno por mola; Outro
th: กลไกการติดตั้งเสาคริกเก็ต: ฐานถอดออกได้; ติดแน่น; พับงอและดีดกลับได้; เบลถาวร; เด้งกลับ; สปริงดีดกลับ; อื่นๆ
ru: Механизм калитки: Съемное основание; Фиксированный; Гибкий возвратный; Несъемные перемычки; Отскок; Пружинный; Другое
bg-BG: Механизъм на пънчето: Подвижна основа; Фиксиран; Гъвкаво връщане; Постоянни напречници; Отскачащ; Възвръщащ се; Друго
hr-HR: Mehanizam panja: Odvojiva baza; Fiksno; Fleksibilni povrat; Trajne prečke; Odbijanje; Povratna opruga; Ostalo
pl: Mechanizm palika: Odłączana podstawa; Stały; Powrót elastyczny; Stałe poprzeczki (bails); Odbijający; Sprężynowy; Inny
pt-BR: Mecanismo dos pinos: Base removível; Fixo; Retorno flexível; Bails permanentes; Rebote; Retorno por mola; Outros
cs: Mechanismus brankové tyče: Odnímatelný podstavec; Pevný; Flexibilní návrat; Pevné baily; Odrazový; Odpružený; Jiné
nl: Wicketmechanisme: Afneembare voet; Vast; Flexibele terugslag; Permanente bails; Terugverend; Terugslagveer; Overig
hu: Kapufa mechanizmusa: Levehető alap; Rögzített; Rugalmas visszatérő; Rögzített pálcák; Visszapattanó; Visszarugózó; Egyéb
da: Mekanisme for cricketstump: Aftagelig base; Fast; Fleksibel tilbagefjedring; Permanente tværpinde; Tilbageslag; Tilbagefjedrende; Andet
ro-RO: Mecanism al jaloanelor: Bază detașabilă; Fix; Revenire flexibilă; Traverse permanente; Ricoșeu; Revenire cu arc; Altele
de: Mechanismus der Stümpfe: Abnehmbare Basis; Fest; Flexi-Return; Feste Bails; Rebound; Spring-Back; Sonstige
tr: Kriket direği mekanizması: Çıkarılabilir taban; Sabit; Esnek geri dönüşlü; Kalıcı bail'ler; Geri tepmeli; Geri yaylanan; Diğer
nb: Mekanisme for stumps: Avtakbar base; Fast; Fleksibel retur; Permanente tverrpinner; Tilbakeslag; Fjærretur; Annet
sv: Stumpmekanism: Avtagbar bas; Fast; Flexibel retur; Fasta bails; Rebound; Fjädrande; Övrigt
zh-TW: 柱門機制: 可拆式底座; 固定式; 彈性回彈; 固定式橫木; 反彈; 彈簧回彈; 其他
vi: Cơ chế gốc cây: Đế có thể tháo rời; Cố định; Phản hồi linh hoạt; Thanh ngang cố định; Bật lại; Bật ngược nhờ lò xo; Khác
en: Stump mechanism: Detachable base; Fixed; Flexi return; Permanent bails; Rebound; Spring-back; Other
fr: Mécanisme de souche: Socle amovible; Fixe; Retour flexible; Témoins permanents; Rebond; À ressort; Autre
ja: スタンプメカニズム: 取り外し可能ベース; 固定式; フレキシリターン; 固定ベイル; リバウンド; スプリングバック; その他
lt-LT: Stulpelių mechanizmas: Nuimamas pagrindas; Fiksuotas; Lankstus grįžtamasis; Pritvirtinti skersiniai; Atšokantys; Spyruokliniai; Kita
zh-CN: 柱门机制: 可拆卸底座; 固定式; 柔性复位; 永久横木; 回弹; 弹簧复位; 其他
it: Meccanismo del moncone: Base staccabile; Fisso; Ritorno flessibile; Traverse permanenti; Rimbalzo; Ritorno a molla; Altro
es: Mecanismo del poste: Base desmontable; Fijo; Retorno flexible; Travesaños permanentes; Rebote; Retorno por resorte; Otro
sk-SK: Mechanizmus stierky: Odnímateľná základňa; Pevný; Flexibilný návrat; Pevné kolíky; Odraz; Odpružené; Iné